Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.301

Sharing commissions.

(1) Except under subsection (4) of this section, it is unlawful for any licensed firm, broker, or managing broker to pay any part of the licensee's commission or other compensation to any person who performs real estate brokerage services and who is not a licensed firm, real estate broker, or managing broker in any state of the United States or its possessions or any foreign jurisdiction with a real estate regulatory program.

(2) Except under subsection (4) of this section, it is unlawful for any licensed real estate firm to pay any part of the firm's commission from brokerage services or other compensation to a real estate broker or managing broker not licensed to do business for the firm.

(3) Except under subsection (4) of this section, it is unlawful for licensed brokers or managing brokers to pay any part of their commission from brokerage services or other compensation to any person, whether licensed or not, except through the firm's designated broker.

(4) A commission may be shared with a manufactured housing retailer, licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW, on the sale of personal property manufactured housing sold in conjunction with the sale or lease of land.

[ 2008 c 23 s 41; 1998 c 46 s 3; 1997 c 322 s 20; 1953 c 235 s 15; 1943 c 118 s 6; 1941 c 252 s 24; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8340-47. Formerly RCW 18.85.330.]